Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 8
ENFORCEMENT

5-10-801. Administrator responsibility.

The administrator shall enforce this article. To carry out this responsibility, the administrator shall be authorized to:

Receive and act on complaints, take action designed to obtain voluntary compliance with this article, or commence proceedings on the administrator's own initiative;

Issue and enforce cease and desist or other administrative enforcement orders in the same manner as set forth in section 5-6-109;

Make investigations; issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents, which subpoenas may be issued to any person, whether located in this state or elsewhere, who has engaged in or is engaging in any violation of this article; administer oaths; conduct hearings in aid of any investigation or inquiry necessary to administer the provisions of this article; and apply to the appropriate court for an appropriate order to effect the purposes of this article;

Counsel persons and groups on their rights and duties under this article;

Establish programs for the education of consumers with respect to rental purchase agreement practices and problems;

Bring a civil action to restrain a person from violating this article and for other appropriate relief in the same manner as set forth in sections 5-6-111 to 5-6-114 and for a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars per violation; and

Use any of his enforcement powers to restrain or take other action against any person found to be making or enforcing rental purchase agreements which contain any unconscionable provisions or clauses.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 374, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) and (1)(e) amended, p. 1870, § 102, effective August 2.

L. 2011:

(1)(e) amended, (HB 11-1221), ch. 121, p. 381, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-248), ch. 270, p. 1418, § 4, effective July 1.

5-10-802. Lessor's records and investigations.

In administering this article and in order to determine compliance with this article, the administrator may examine the books and records of persons subject to the article and may make investigations of persons necessary to determine compliance. For this purpose, the administrator may administer oaths or affirmations, and, upon the administrator's own motion or upon request of any party, may subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, compel testimony, and require the production of any matter that is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of, any books, documents, or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts, or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence. If the administrator prevails in any civil action brought as a result of such an investigation, the court shall award the administrator costs and a reasonable attorney fee.

If the person's records are located outside Colorado, the person shall, at the person's option, either make them available to the administrator at a convenient location in Colorado, or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the administrator or the administrator's representative to examine them at the place where they are maintained. The administrator may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect them on the administrator's behalf.

Upon failure without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena or to give testimony and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the administrator may apply to a court for an order compelling compliance.

The administrator may not make public the name or identity of a person whose acts or conduct the administrator investigates under this section or the facts disclosed in the investigation, but this subsection (4) shall not apply to disclosures in actions or enforcement proceedings under this article.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 375, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-803. Assurance of discontinuance.

If it is claimed that a person has engaged in conduct subject to an order by the administrator or by a court under this article, the administrator may accept an assurance in writing that the person will not engage in the conduct in the future. If a person giving an assurance of discontinuance fails to comply with its terms, the assurance shall be evidence that before the assurance the person engaged in the conduct described in the assurance.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 375, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-804. Notification by lessors - contents.

A lessor shall file a notification as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section with the administrator:

Within thirty days after soliciting or entering into a rental purchase agreement subject to this article; and

Before February 1 in each subsequent year that the lessor solicits or enters into a rental purchase agreement subject to this article.

The notification required under subsection (1) of this section shall state the following:

The name of the lessor and, if different, the name in which business is transacted;

The address of the lessor's principal office, which may be outside Colorado;

The address of all offices or stores, if any, in Colorado at which rental purchase agreements are made;

If rental purchase agreements are made in a place other than an office or store in Colorado, a brief description of the place and manner in which they are made; and

The address of the registered agent upon whom service of process may be made in Colorado.

If information in a notification becomes inaccurate after filing, no further notification is required until the lessor is required to file a subsequent notification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 376, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-805. Fees.

A lessor required to file a notification with the administrator under section 5-10-804 shall pay to the administrator the following fees:

Fifty dollars for each address listed in section 5-10-804 (2)(c) paid at the time of the filing of the initial notification with the administrator;

Twenty-five dollars for each address listed in section 5-10-804 (2)(c) paid at the time of the filing of each annual notification subsequently filed with the administrator.

In addition to the fees required under subsection (1) of this section, if the administrator examines the books and records of the lessor, the lessor shall pay to the administrator a fee of two hundred dollars for each day required for the administrator or the administrator's representative to conduct the examination. However, the sum of all fees collected from a lessor under this subsection (2) may not exceed one thousand dollars in any calendar year.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in this section, the administrator by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the administrator by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 376, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 98:

(3) added, p. 1320, § 12, effective June 1.